Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-552
Substitution of proof of financial responsibility.

The department shall consent to the cancellation of any bond or certificate of insurance or the department shall direct and the State Treasurer shall return any money or securities to the person entitled thereto upon the substitution and acceptance of other adequate proof of financial responsibility pursuant to sections 60-501 to 60-569.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 52, p. 500.